Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.010

Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5224.SL) ***

When used in this chapter:

(1) "Applicant" means an individual who has received a conditional offer of employment with a law enforcement or corrections agency.

(2) "Chief for a day program" means a program in which commissioners and staff partner with local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies, hospitals, and the community to provide a day of special attention to chronically ill children. Each child is selected and sponsored by a law enforcement agency. The event, "chief for a day," occurs on one day, annually or every other year and may occur on the grounds and in the facilities of the commission. The program may include any appropriate honoring of the child as a "chief," such as a certificate swearing them in as a chief, a badge, a uniform, and donated gifts such as games, puzzles, and art supplies.

(3) "Commission" means the Washington state criminal justice training commission.

(4) "Convicted" means at the time a plea of guilty, nolo contendere, or deferred sentence has been accepted, or a verdict of guilty or finding of guilt has been filed, notwithstanding the pendency of any future proceedings, including but not limited to sentencing, posttrial or postfact-finding motions and appeals. "Conviction" includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction, all proceedings in which there is a case disposition agreement, and any equivalent disposition by a court in a jurisdiction other than the state of Washington.

(5) "Correctional personnel" means any employee or volunteer who by state, county, municipal, or combination thereof, statute has the responsibility for the confinement, care, management, training, treatment, education, supervision, or counseling of those individuals whose civil rights have been limited in some way by legal sanction.

(6) "Corrections officer" means any corrections agency employee whose primary job function is to provide for the custody, safety, and security of adult persons in jails and detention facilities in the state. "Corrections officer" does not include individuals employed by state agencies.

(7) "Criminal justice personnel" means any person who serves as a peace officer, reserve officer, or corrections officer.

(8) "Finding" means a determination based on a preponderance of the evidence whether alleged misconduct occurred; did not occur; occurred, but was consistent with law and policy; or could neither be proven or disproven.

(9) "Law enforcement personnel" means any person elected, appointed, or employed as a general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 or as a limited authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020 who as a normal part of their duties has powers of arrest and carries a firearm. For the purposes of this chapter, "law enforcement personnel" does not include individuals employed by the department of corrections.

(10) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as a general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020. Commissioned officers of the Washington state patrol, whether they have been or may be exempted by rule of the commission from the basic training requirement of RCW 43.101.200, are included as peace officers for purposes of this chapter. Fish and wildlife officers with enforcement powers for all criminal laws under RCW 77.15.075 are peace officers for purposes of this chapter. Limited authority Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020, who have powers of arrest and carry a firearm as part of their normal duty, are peace officers for purposes of this chapter. For the purposes of this chapter, "peace officer" does not include individuals employed by the department of corrections.

(11) "Reserve officer" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 10.93.020.

(12) "Specially commissioned Washington peace officer" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 10.93.020.

(13) "Tribal police officer" means any person employed and commissioned by a tribal government to enforce the criminal laws of that government.

[ 2024 c 319 s 5; 2023 c 168 s 1. Prior: 2021 c 323 s 1; 2020 c 119 s 2; 2008 c 69 s 2; 2003 c 39 s 27; 2001 c 167 s 1; 1981 c 132 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 212 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 94 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—2008 c 69: "The legislature finds that the Washington state criminal justice commission's participation in charitable work, such as the "chief for a day" program that provides special attention to chronically ill children through recognition by various law enforcement agencies within the state, advances the overall purposes of the commission by promoting positive relationships between law enforcement and the citizens of the state of Washington." [ 2008 c 69 s 1.]

Civil rights

loss of: State Constitution Art. 6 s 3, RCW 29A.08.520.

restoration of: RCW 9.92.066, 9.94A.637, 9.94A.885, 9.95.260, chapter 9.96 RCW.